Wisconsin, session 2025, SB749.
do enact as follows:SB749,14Section 1. 440.88 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB749,2,135440.88 (4) Applications; certification period. An application for 1certification as a substance abuse counselor, clinical supervisor, or prevention 2specialist under this section shall be made on a form provided by the department 3and filed with the department and shall be accompanied by the initial credential fee 4determined by the department under s. 440.03 (9) (a). The renewal date for 5certification as a substance abuse counselor, clinical supervisor, or prevention 6specialist is specified under s. 440.08 (2) (a) and the renewal fee for such 7certifications is determined by the department under s. 440.03 (9) (a). 8Notwithstanding s. 440.08 (2) (a) 9m., the renewal date for certification as a 9substance abuse counselor-in-training, a clinical supervisor-in-training, or a 10prevention specialist-in-training is 2 years from the date the certification is 11granted. Renewal of certification as a substance abuse counselor-in-training, a 12clinical supervisor-in-training, or a prevention specialist-in-training may be made 13only twice.SB749,2,1414